Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB961.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Freedom in Public Contracting Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Public body." The Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions or an agency or authority of either."Public works." Construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration or repair work, other than routine maintenance work, contracted for by a public body."Successful bidder." A person, partnership or corporation 12345678910111213141516171819 that has:(1) the capability in all respects to fully perform the requirements under a contract for public works; and(2) the integrity and reliability that will ensure good faith performance.Section 3. Prohibited practices.Contract specifications issued by a public body soliciting bids on public works may not include any of the following:(1) A requirement that the successful bidder or any of its subcontractors utilize workers:(i) represented by a designated labor organization; or(ii) referred by a designated labor organization.(2) A requirement that the successful bidder's existing workforce or any of its subcontractors' workforces affiliate with or pay dues to a labor organization.(3) A requirement that the successful bidder or any of its subcontractors recognize a labor organization as the exclusive representative of any employees on the public works.(4) A requirement that the successful bidder or any of its subcontractors participate in an apprenticeship program.(5) A requirement that the successful bidder or any of its subcontractors pay employees a predetermined amount or rate of wages, except as may be required by Federal law or the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act, or the act of January 17, 1968 (P.L.11, No.5), known as The Minimum Wage Act of 1968.(6) A requirement that the successful bidder or any of its subcontractors provide employees a specified type, amount 20250SB0961PN1087 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or rate of employee benefits.Section 4. Discrimination prohibited.A public body may not consider or use as a criterion in its selection process for a successful bidder:(1) the union or nonunion status of the successful bidder's workforce; or(2) the successful bidder's participation, or lack of participation, in an apprenticeship program.Section 5. Enforcement.(a) Private right of action.--A party that is aggrieved by an act committed by a public body in violation of section 3 or 4 may file an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin the act.(b) Damages and attorney fees.--A court of competent jurisdiction may award damages and reasonable attorney fees to an aggrieved party that is successful in an action filed under subsection (a).Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0961PN1087 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819